Utah statutes.
63A-9-402.   State-owned vehicle report -- Contents.
(1)  On or before October 1 of each year, each agency that owns or leases
vehicles shall submit a report to the division that contains at least the
following information:
(a)  a description of each vehicle owned or leased by that agency, including
the license number, year, make, and model of the vehicle;
(b)  the person and administrative unit within the agency to whom each vehicle
is assigned; and
(c)  a vehicle fleet cost efficiency plan in accordance with the provisions of
Section 63A-9-401.5.
(2) (a)  On or before November 1 of each calendar year, the director of the
division shall submit a state-owned vehicle report to the governor and to the
legislative fiscal analyst.
(b)  The report shall contain a summary of vehicles owned or leased by each
state agency including:
(i)  a description of each vehicle owned or leased by each agency;
(ii)  the person or administrative unit within the agency to whom each vehicle
is assigned; and
(iii)  standard measures of cost for the previous year, for each vehicle,
including:
(A)  vehicle cost per mile;
(B)  total vehicles;
(C)  total fuel used; and
(D)  miles per gallon of fuel.
(3)  The legislative fiscal analyst shall submit the information from the
state-owned vehicle report about each agency's state-owned vehicles to the
legislative appropriation subcommittee that has jurisdiction over that agency.
(4) (a)  Vehicles used in official investigative work where secrecy is
essential are exempt from the requirements of this section.
(b)  The report to the governor and legislative fiscal analyst shall include
the total number of state vehicles used in official investigative work where
secrecy is essential that are not otherwise accounted for in the report.
